Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2461.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 53, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-5304, to read: START_STATUTE41-5304. Community college apprenticeship and workforce development program fund; rules; definition A. The community college apprenticeship and workforce development program fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to sections 43-1015, 43-1112 and 43-1712. The Office shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. B. The office shall establish an application process for community colleges to apply for and receive monies from the fund for the development and administration of apprenticeship and workforce development programs at a community college. C. The office shall adopt rules and prescribe forms to administer this section. D. For the purposes of this section, "community college" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-1401. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 43, chapter 10, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 43-1015, to read: START_STATUTE43-1015. Employer surcharge for community college apprenticeship and workforce development programs A. In addition to any other tax imposed by this chapter, For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026, a taxpayer who is the owner of a business that operates in this state and that employs fifty or more employees shall pay a community college apprenticeship and workforce development program surcharge in an amount equal to one percent of the amount of payroll taxes that the taxpayer paid during the taxable year. B. Co-owners of a business, including partners in a partnership, members of a limited liability company and shareholders of an S corporation as defined in section 1361 of the internal revenue code, shall each pay the pro rata share of the surcharge required under this section based on ownership interests. C. Notwithstanding sections 42-1116 and 43-206, the department shall separately account for the revenues collected pursuant to this section and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, those revenues in the community college apprenticeship and workforce development program fund established by section 41-5304. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 43, chapter 11, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 43-1112, to read: START_STATUTE43-1112. Employer surcharge for community college apprenticeship and workforce development programs A. In addition to any other tax imposed by this chapter, For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026, a corporation that operates in this state and that employs fifty or more employees shall pay a community college apprenticeship and workforce development program surcharge in an amount equal to one percent of the amount of payroll taxes that the corporation paid during the taxable year. B. Notwithstanding sections 42-1116 and 43-206, the department shall separately account for the revenues collected pursuant to this section and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, those revenues in the community college apprenticeship and workforce development program fund established by section 41-5304. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 43, chapter 17, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 43-1712, to read: START_STATUTE43-1712. Employer surcharge for community college apprenticeship and workforce development programs A. In addition to any other tax imposed by this chapter, for taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026, an Arizona small business taxpayer that operates in this state and that employs fifty or more employees shall pay a community college apprenticeship and workforce development program surcharge in an amount equal to one percent of the amount of payroll taxes that the Arizona small business taxpayer paid during the taxable year. B. Notwithstanding sections 42-1116 and 43-206, the department shall separately account for the revenues collected pursuant to this section and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, those revenues in the community college apprenticeship and workforce development program fund established by section 41-5304. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Requirements for enactment; two-thirds vote Pursuant to article IX, section 22, Constitution of Arizona, this act is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and is effective immediately on the signature of the governor or, if the governor vetoes this act, on the subsequent affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.